Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.010

Board president, vice president or president pro tempore—Secretary.

At the first meeting of the members of the board they shall elect a president and vice president from among their number who shall serve for a term of one year or until their successors are elected. In the event of the temporary absence or disability of both the president and vice president, the board of directors may elect a president pro tempore who shall discharge all the duties of president during such temporary absence or disability.

The superintendent of such school district shall act as secretary to the board in accordance with the provisions of RCW 28A.400.030.

[ 1990 c 33 s 341; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.030. Prior: 1953 c 111 s 6; prior: 1909 c 97 p 290 s 3, part; RRS s 4792, part. Formerly RCW 28A.59.030, 28.62.030.]